Washington statutes.
RCW 18.260.100

Examinations.

(1) The commission may approve a written examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing agencies for use by an applicant in meeting the licensing requirements under RCW 18.260.050. The requirement that the examination be written does not exclude the use of computerized test administration.

(2) The commission, upon consultation with the dental hygiene examining committee, may approve a clinical examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing agencies for use by an applicant in meeting the licensing requirements under RCW 18.260.050.

[ 2007 c 269 s 10.]